Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-925.04
Sewers; rental charges; cumulative to service rate for maintenance and repair.

The charges permitted by sections 17-925.02 to 17-925.04 shall be in addition to the charges permitted by section 17-925.01 for the maintenance and repair of a sewer system.

Laws 1947, c. 43, § 3, p. 159;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 264.